Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB680.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 603 of the act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law, is amended to read:Section 603. Summary Proceedings.--All summary proceedings under the provisions of this act may be commenced by the Office 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 of Attorney General under the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the "Commonwealth Attorneys Act," or brought before any district justice of the county where the offense occurred or the unlawful discharge of sewage, industrial waste or pollution was maintained, or in the county where the public is affected, [and to that end jurisdiction is hereby conferred upon said district justices,] subject to appeal by either party in the manner provided by law. In the case of any appeal from any such conviction in the manner provided by law for appeals from summary conviction, it shall be the duty of the Office of Attorney General or the district attorney of the county to represent the interests of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0680PN0694 - 2 - 12345678910111213